Illinois, session 104th, HB1902.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Animal Welfare Act is amended by adding 5Section 3.16 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 605/3.16 new)7    Sec. 3.16. Dog breeders; genetic testing. Dog breeders 8must genetically test or have their dogs genetically tested 9for diseases that cause early death or physical impairments. 10If the dog breeder finds that a dog he or she breeds has a 11genetic defect or mutation that causes early death or physical 12impairments, the dog breeder must have that dog sterilized.